Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-403
Statewide general election; when held.

The statewide general election shall be held on the first Tuesday following the first Monday in November in each even-numbered year.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 95.

There is more than one type of general election. This section does not govern time of holding general municipal election. Allen v. Tobin, 155 Neb. 212, 51 N.W.2d 338 (1952).